Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 1.1 State Crime Laboratory Commission

12-1.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “State Crime Laboratory Commission.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 206, § 2; G.L., §

12-1.2-1

; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1.

12-1.1-2.
Legislative findings and purpose.

The general assembly recognizes and declares that:

Examining crime scenes for evidence is essentially a state and local problem;

The establishment of appropriate goals, objectives, and standards for the examination of crime scenes and the training of appropriate personnel in such techniques must be a priority concern;

The functions of a state crime lab must be coordinated in an efficient and effective manner;

The full and effective use of resources affecting state and local crime scene investigations requires the complete cooperation of state and local law enforcement agencies; and

Training, research, evaluation, and technical assistance activities must be encouraged and focused on the improvement of scientific criminal investigation in Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 206, § 2; G.L. §

12-1.2-2

; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1; G.L. §

12-1.1-2

.

12-1.1-3.
Creation.

There is established the state laboratories for scientific criminal investigation commission, called throughout this chapter the state crime laboratory commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 206, § 2; G.L. §

12-1.2-3

; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1; G.L. §

12-1.1-3

.

12-1.1-4.
Membership.

The commission shall consist of five (5) members: the attorney general; the superintendent of state police; and a representative of the Rhode Island Police Chiefs Association appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate; and two (2) public members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. Appointed public members shall serve two (2) year terms and shall be eligible to succeed themselves.

Members shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified. Each member of the board may designate a subordinate within his or her department or agency to represent him or her at all meetings of the board. Three (3) members of the board shall constitute a quorum and the vote of a majority of those present and voting shall be required for action.

Members of the commission shall be removable by the governor pursuant to the provisions of §

36-1-7

of the general laws and for cause only, and removal solely for partisan or personal reasons unrelated to capacity or fitness for the office shall be unlawful.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 206, § 2: G.L. §

12-1.2-3

; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1: G.L. §

12-1.1-4

; P.L. 2006, ch. 54, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 70, § 1.

12-1.1-5.
Chairperson.

The attorney general shall be the chairperson of the commission. The board may elect from among its members such other officers as it deems necessary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 206, § 2: G.L. §

12-1.2-3

; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1: G.L. §

12-1.1-5

; P.L. 2006, ch. 54, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 70, § 1.

12-1.1-6.
Executive secretary.

The dean of the College of Pharmacy at the University of Rhode Island shall serve as the executive secretary of the commission. The executive secretary shall oversee the administration of the state crime laboratory, including all budgetary and personnel matters, and shall provide timely reports to the commission regarding all matters pertaining to the state crime laboratory.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 206, § 2: G.L. §

12-1.2-3

; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1: G.L. §

12-1.1-6

; P.L. 1994, ch. 50, § 1.

12-1.1-7.
Meetings.

The commission shall meet at the call of its chairperson and at least four (4) times each year, the time and place for the meetings to be fixed by the chairperson.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 206, § 2: G.L. §

12-1.2-6

; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1: G.L. §

12-1.1-7

.

12-1.1-8.
Powers and duties of commission.

The commission shall have the following powers and duties:

Establish goals, priorities, standards, policies, plans, programs, and budgets for the operation of the state crime laboratory;

Monitor the general operation of the state crime laboratory and evaluate its effectiveness;

Apply for, contract for, receive, and expend for its purposes any appropriations or grants from the state and/or its political subdivisions, the federal government, or any other source, public or private, in accordance with the appropriations process;

Accept funds appropriated by the general assembly out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated for effectuating the daily operation of the state crime laboratory;

Accept any moneys made available through direct grants for its function and operation;

Expend these sums of money for the purchase of equipment, payment of salaries, purchase of material, office supplies, and laboratory supplies, and for labor for publishing, for the benefit of law enforcement officers in the state of Rhode Island, for scientific advances in the field of criminalistics, and any other essentials that may be deemed necessary and expedient to the scientific criminal investigation and training of law enforcement officers and firefighters in modern scientific investigative techniques and research in the field of scientific criminal investigation;

Recommend legislation to the governor and legislature in the field of scientific criminal investigation;

Provide suitable badges and appropriate commissions to laboratory personnel in evidence of their authority;

Establish any and all committees it deems necessary to carry out the mission of the state crime laboratory;

Perform any other duties that may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter and chapter 1.2.

Within ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year, the commission shall approve and submit an annual report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the secretary of state, of its activities during that fiscal year. The report shall provide: an operating statement summarizing meetings or hearings held, including meeting minutes, subjects addressed, decisions rendered, rules or regulations promulgated, studies conducted, policies and plans developed, approved, or modified, and programs administered or initiated; a consolidated financial statement of all funds received and expended including the source of the funds, a listing of any staff supported by these funds, and a summary of any clerical, administrative or technical support received; a summary of performance during the previous fiscal year including accomplishments, shortcomings and remedies; a synopsis of hearings, complaints, suspensions, or other legal matters related to the commission; a summary of any training courses held pursuant to this chapter; a briefing on anticipated activities in the upcoming fiscal year; and findings and recommendations for improvements. The report shall be posted electronically on the websites of the general assembly and the secretary of state pursuant to the provisions of §

42-20-8.2

. The director of the department of administration shall be responsible for the enforcement of the provisions of this subsection;

To approve or disapprove the director and all other positions of the state crime laboratory appointed by the University of Rhode Island.

To conduct a training course for newly appointed and qualified members within six (6) months of their qualification or designation. The course shall be developed by the chair of the commission, be approved by the commission, and be conducted by the chair of the commission. The commission may approve the use of any commission and/or staff members and/or individuals to assist with training. The training course shall include instruction in the following areas: the provisions of chapters 42-46, 36-14 and 38-2; and the commission’s rules and regulations. The director of the department of administration shall, within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this act [June 7, 2006], prepare and disseminate training materials relating to the provisions of chapters 42-46, 36-14, and 38-2.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 206, § 2: G.L. §§

12-1.2-4

,

12-1.2-5

,

12-1.2-7

,

12-1.2-8

; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1: G.L. §

12-1.1-8

; P.L. 1994, ch. 50, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 54, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 70, § 1.

12-1.1-9.
Repealed.

12-1.1-10.
Cooperation of departments — Using facilities of the University of Rhode Island.

All other departments, agencies, and bodies of state government are authorized and directed to cooperate with and furnish any information that the commission shall require. The commission is directed in carrying out the provisions and purposes of this chapter and chapter 1.2 to confer with the University of Rhode Island as to the continued utilization of facilities, scientific equipment, and personnel available.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 206, § 2: G.L. § 12-1.2-12; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1: G.L. §

12-1.1-10

.

12-1.1-11.
Termination or modification of commission — Report to governor.

For good cause, the commission, with the approval of the governor, shall determine a termination or modification date, and, upon that determination, the commission shall submit a report to the governor that will outline a plan for the orderly termination or modification of the commission.

The report will be submitted at least four (4) months prior to the termination or modification date and will include, but not be limited to, a review of the performance and effectiveness of the commission.

The report will include a recommendation that the purpose of this chapter or chapter 1.2 be reviewed or amended, that the commission be reorganized, or that this chapter or chapter 1.2 be repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 206, § 2: G.L. § 12-1.2-13; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1: G.L. §

12-1.1-11

.